District of Columbia statutes.
47-2213

Incorporation and application of certain provisions of Chapter 20.

The provisions of §§ 47-2019 to 47-2021, 47-2023, 47-2024, and 47-2027 are hereby incorporated in and made applicable to this chapter.

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 128, ch. 146, title II, § 223
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(mm)(2), 48 DCR 334
Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”
D.C. Law 13-305 rewrote the section.
1973 Ed., § 47-2713.
1981 Ed., § 47-2213.